Wisconsin, session 2025, AB415.
do enact as follows:AB415,1Section 1. 20.932 of the statutes is created to read:20.932 Use restrictions of state and local government electronic devices. (1) Definitions. In this section:(a) “Artificial intelligence” means an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.(b) “Department” means the department of administration.(c) 1. Except as provided under subd. 2., “foreign adversary” means any of the following:a. The People’s Republic of China, including the Hong Kong Special Administrative Region and the Macau Special Administrative Region.b. The Republic of Cuba.c. The Islamic Republic of Iran.d. The Democratic People’s Republic of Korea.e. The Russian Federation.f. The Venezuelan regime of Nicolás Maduro.2. “Foreign adversary” does not include any country, government, regime, or person specified under subd. 1. if the country, government, regime, or person is not included in the list of foreign adversaries under 15 CFR 791.4, as amended from time to time.(d) “Generative artificial intelligence” means artificial intelligence that can generate derived synthetic content, including text, images, video, and audio, that emulates the structure and characteristics of its training data.(e) “State agency” means an association, authority, board, department, commission, independent agency, institution, system, office, society, or other body in state government created or authorized to be created by the constitution or any law.(2) Use restrictions. No state agency, other than a law enforcement agency, as defined in s. 165.83 (1) (b), for law enforcement purposes, may do any of the following using an electronic device that is owned, operated, or leased by the state agency:(a) Download, use, or access a web-based or other social media application, channel, or platform that is owned or controlled by a foreign adversary.(b) Use any user-downloaded software, or software application or any generative artificial intelligence that is owned or controlled by a foreign adversary.(3) Information technology policies and standards. (a) In this subsection:1. “Information technology” has the meaning given in s. 16.97 (6).2. Notwithstanding sub. (1) (e), “state agency” means a state agency in the executive branch of state government and each authority, as defined in s. 16.41 (4).(b) 1. The department shall develop and publish policies and standards for officials, employees, and contractors of state agencies regarding information technology that is owned or controlled by a foreign adversary. The policies and standards shall address the information technology’s supply chain, the potential impacts on future state agency procurements, and the potential need for remediation or phase-out of previously procured information technology that is owned or controlled by a foreign adversary.2. State agencies may not develop or publish their own policies and standards regarding information technology that is owned or controlled by a foreign adversary if the policies and standards are less restrictive than those developed and published by the department.(c) The legislative technology services bureau shall develop and publish policies and standards for officials, employees, and contractors of the legislature regarding information technology that is owned or controlled by a foreign adversary. The policies and standards shall address the information technology’s supply chain, the potential impacts on future procurements, and the potential need for remediation or phase-out of previously procured information technology that is owned or controlled by a foreign adversary.(d) The director of state courts shall develop and publish policies and standards for officials, employees, and contractors of the court system regarding information technology that is owned or controlled by a foreign adversary. The policies and standards shall address the information technology’s supply chain, the potential impacts on future procurements, and the potential need for remediation or phase-out of previously procured information technology that is owned or controlled by a foreign adversary.(e) No policy or standard under par. (b), (c), or (d) applies to a law enforcement agency, as defined in s. 165.83 (1) (b), using information technology for law enforcement purposes.AB415,2Section 2. Effective dates. This act takes effect on January 31, 2027. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab415 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab415 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB415 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB415 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB415: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting